Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1701.03
Sheriff; general powers and duties.

The sheriff shall exercise the powers and perform the duties conferred and imposed upon him or her by other statutes and by the common law.

R.S.1867, Code § 892, p. 548;

R.S.1913, § 8566;

C.S.1922, § 9517;

C.S.1929, § 20-2218;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 25-2217;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 13.